South Dakota, session 2026, SB62.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 36-16-2 be AMENDED:
36-16-2. Terms used in this chapter mean:
(1) "Apprentice electrician," a person learning the trade under the supervision and
employment of an electrical contractor, journeyman electrician, or Class B
electrician, or a person learning the trade under the supervision of a 501(d)
electrician, or a person employed by a public entity or private corporation, firm or
partnership who is learning the trade under the supervision of an electrical
contractor or Class B electrician who is employed by the same public entity or
private corporation, limited liability company, firm, or partnership;
(2) "Class B electrician," a person licensed under this chapter before July 1, 2026,
having the necessary qualifications, training, and technical knowledge, and at least
thirty-six months' experience in wiring, installing, and repairing electrical
apparatus and equipment in accordance with the standard rules established by the
State Electrical Commission;
(3) "Electrical contractor," a person having the necessary qualifications, training,
experience, and technical knowledge to plan, lay out, and supervise the installation
and repair of electrical wiring, apparatus, and equipment for electric light, heat,
and power in accordance with the standard rules governing such the work; and
who undertakes or offers to undertake with another to plan for, lay out, supervise,
and install or to make additions, alterations and repairs in the installation of such
the work;
(4) "Electrical inspector," a person experienced in all classes of electrical work and
either:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.389.9 2 62
(a) Is a graduate of a recognized electrical school as approved by State
Electrical Commission rules and has a total of four years of experience in
electrical work, excluding school experience,; or
(b) Has at least six years of practical experience in electrical wiring.
A qualified inspector may be issued an electrical contractor's license if the qualified
inspector pays the necessary fees as set forth in this chapter;
(5) "Journeyman electrician," a person having the necessary qualifications, training,
technical knowledge and at least four years of experience in wiring, installing, and
repairing electrical apparatus and equipment in accordance with the standard rules
established by the State Electrical Commission;
(6) "Maintenance electrician," a person working under a maintenance electrician's
license of a public entity, firm, partnership, limited liability company, or
corporation; and
(7) "501(d) electrician," a person having the necessary qualifications, training and
technical knowledge in wiring, installing, and repairing electrical apparatus and
equipment in accordance with the administrative rules promulgated by the State
Electrical Commission, pursuant to chapter 1-26. A 501(d) licensee, who is
restricted to wiring on 501(d) properties within the State of South Dakota. 501(d)
is the reference to the federal internal revenue code that provides the exemption
for a religious or apostolic association or corporation this state.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.